Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4284.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5l. (1) A license to carry a concealed pistol, including a renewal license, is valid until the applicant's date of birth that falls not less than 4 years or more than 5 years after the license is issued or renewed, as applicable. The county clerk shall notify the licensee that his or her the licensee's license is about to expire and may be renewed as provided in this section. The notification must be sent by the county clerk to the last known address of the licensee as shown on the records of the county clerk. The notification must be sent in a sealed envelope by first-class mail not less than 3 months or more than 6 months before the expiration date of the current license. Except as provided in this section, a renewal of a license under section 5b must be issued in the same manner as an original license issued under section 5b. An applicant is eligible for a renewal of a license under this section if his or her the applicant's license is not expired, or expired within a 1-year period before the date of application under this section. Each applicant who submits an application for a renewal license to a county clerk under this section shall pay an application and licensing fee of $115.00 $30.00 by any method of payment accepted by that county for payments of other fees and penalties. No other charge, fee, cost, or assessment, including any local charge, fee, cost, or assessment, is required of the applicant except as specifically authorized in this act. The applicant shall pay the application and licensing fee to the county. The county treasurer shall deposit $36.00 of each the fee collected under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The county treasurer shall forward the balance remaining to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the balance of the fee in the general fund to the credit of the department of state police. (2) Subject to subsections (9) (8) and (10), (9), an application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol may be submitted not more than 6 months before the expiration of the current license. No later than December 1, 2018, the The department of state police shall provide a system for an applicant to submit his or her the applicant's application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol online or by first-class mail and shall accept those applications on behalf of the county clerk as required under this act. at no additional charge. Each applicant who submits a renewal license online or by first-class mail to the department of state police under this section shall pay an application and licensing fee of $115.00 $30.00 by any method of payment accepted by the department of state police. No other charge, fee, cost, or assessment is required of the applicant except as specifically authorized in this act. The applicant shall pay the application and licensing fee to the this state. The state treasurer shall forward $36.00 of each the fee collected under this subsection to the county treasurer who shall deposit the $36.00 fee in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The state treasurer shall deposit the balance of the fee in the general fund to the credit of the department of state police. The department of state police shall notify the county clerk of the county in which the applicant resides of a properly submitted online application or application by first-class mail received by the department. If the county clerk issues a renewal license under this section, the county clerk shall send the license to the licensee by first-class mail in a sealed envelope. If the county clerk issues the renewal, the effective date of the renewal license is the date of expiration of the current license or the date of approval or issue of the renewal, whichever is later, and the date of expiration is the applicant's date of birth which is not less than 4 years or more than 5 years from the effective date of the license. (3) The department of state police shall complete the verification required under section 5b(6) and the county clerk shall issue a renewal license or a notice of statutory disqualification within not later than 30 days after the date the renewal application was received. Beginning on the date the department of state police establishes a system under subsection (2), the The department of state police shall provide an applicant a digital receipt, or a receipt by first-class mail if requested, for his or her the applicant's renewal application submitted online at the time the application is received by the department of state police. Beginning on the date the department of state police establishes a system under subsection (2), the The department of state police shall mail an applicant a receipt by first-class mail for his or her the applicant's renewal application submitted by first-class mail at the time the application is received by the department of state police. The receipt issued under this subsection to an individual applying for a renewal license whose current license is not expired at the time of application must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The date and time the receipt is issued. (c) The amount paid. (d) The applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (e) The statement "This receipt was issued for the purpose of renewal of a concealed pistol license. As provided in section 5l of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425l, this receipt shall serve as a concealed pistol license for the individual named in the receipt when carried with the expired license and is valid until a license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. This receipt does not exempt the individual named in the receipt from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms.". (f) The name of the county in which the receipt is issued, if applicable. (g) An impression of the county seal, if applicable. (4) The receipt issued under subsection (3) to an individual applying for a renewal license whose license is expired must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The date and time the receipt is issued. (c) The amount paid. (d) The applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (e) The statement "This receipt was issued for the purpose of renewal of a concealed pistol license. As provided in section 5l of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425l, if a license or notice of statutory disqualification is not issued within 30 days after the date this receipt was issued, this receipt shall serve as a concealed pistol license for the individual named in the receipt when carried with an official state-issued driver license or personal identification card. The receipt is valid as a license until a license or a notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. This receipt does not exempt the individual named in the receipt from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms.". (5) Until November 30, 2018, a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state may submit his or her application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol by first-class mail, containing the required fee, a notarized application, the licensee's address of record within the state, the licensee's orders to report to a duty station outside of this state, and if the licensee desires to have his or her application receipt, renewal license, or any other notices mailed to his or her address of assignment or deployment, a letter requesting that action including the address of assignment or deployment. If the county clerk issues a renewal license under this section, the county clerk shall send the license to the licensee by first-class mail in a sealed envelope. If the licensee is a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state and requests that his or her license be sent to the address of assignment or deployment, the county clerk shall mail the license to the licensee at the address of assignment or deployment provided in the renewal application. Until November 30, 2018, if a renewal application is submitted by a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state, the county clerk shall mail a receipt to the licensee by first-class mail. (5) (6) If an individual applies for a renewal license before the expiration of his or her the individual's license, the expiration date of the current license is extended until the renewal license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued. The county clerk shall notify the department of state police in a manner prescribed by the department of state police after he or she the county clerk receives an application for renewal. The department of state police shall immediately enter into the law enforcement information network the date that application for renewal was submitted and that the renewal application is pending. (6) (7) A person An individual carrying a concealed pistol after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license under an extension under subsection (6) (5) shall keep the receipt issued by the county clerk under subsection (3) and his or her the individual's expired license in his or her the individual's possession at all times that he or she the individual is carrying the pistol. For the purposes of this act, the receipt is considered to be part of the license to carry a concealed pistol until a renewal license is issued or denied or a notice of statutory disqualification is issued. (7) (8) The educational requirements under section 5b(7)(c) are waived for an applicant who is a retired police officer or retired law enforcement officer. (8) (9) The educational requirements under section 5b(7)(c) for an applicant who is applying for a renewal of a license under this act are waived except that the applicant shall certify that he or she the applicant has completed at least 3 hours' review of the training described under section 5b(7)(c) and has had at least 1 hour of firing range time in the 6 months immediately preceding the subsequent application. The educational and firing range requirements of this subsection are met if the applicant certifies on the renewal application form that he or she the applicant has complied with the requirements of this subsection. An applicant is not required to verify the statements made under this subsection and is not required to obtain a certificate or undergo training other than as required by this subsection. (9) (10) An applicant who is applying for a renewal of a license issued under section 5b is not required to have fingerprints taken again under section 5b(9) if all of the following conditions have been met: (a) There has been established a system for the department of state police to save and maintain in its automated fingerprint identification system (AFIS) database all fingerprints that are submitted to the department of state police under section 5b. (b) The applicant's fingerprints have been submitted to and maintained by the department of state police as described in subdivision (a) for ongoing comparison with the automated fingerprint identification system (AFIS) database.